Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 19 Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1 was redesignated as Chapter 19 and the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1249, § 1 was redesignated as Chapter 20.

2-19-1.
Enactment of chapter; purpose.

This chapter is enacted pursuant to the authority granted to the General Assembly by Article III, Section VI, Paragraph II(a)(3) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia and section 1121 of the federal Omnibus Consolidated and Emergency Supplemental Appropriations Act for Fiscal Year 1999, Public Law 105-277, as amended, and is for the purpose of creating an indemnity fund and making expenditures from such fund to indemnify cotton producers in this state for losses incurred in 1998 or 1999 from the loss of certain properly stored, harvested cotton.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-19-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 956, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 956, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “if any part of this Act is declared unconstitutional, it would have enacted any remaining parts of the Act which preserve its essential intent.”

2-19-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture of this state.

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture of this state.

“Eligible cotton producer” means a person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that grew cotton in this state and that incurred a loss in 1998 or 1999 of such properly stored, harvested cotton as the result of the bankruptcy of one or more warehousemen, brokers, or other parties in possession of such cotton or warehouse receipts evidencing title to such cotton; an improper conversion or transfer of such cotton; the issuance of one or more bad checks in payment for such cotton; or other hazards or events as determined by the Commissioner.

“Federal act” means section 1121 of the federal Omnibus Consolidated and Emergency Supplemental Appropriations Act for Fiscal Year 1999, Public Law 105-277.

“Secretary of agriculture” means the secretary of agriculture of the United States.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-19-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1.

2-19-3.
Powers and duties of the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall have the following powers and duties:

To promulgate suitable rules and regulations to carry out the provisions and purposes of this chapter;

To request from the Attorney General and any court, agency, or department such assistance and data as will enable the Commissioner to determine the losses of cotton producers for which indemnity payments are available pursuant to this chapter and whether, and the extent to which, a claimant qualifies for such compensation. Any person, corporation, partnership, court, agency, or department is authorized to provide the Commissioner with the information requested upon receipt of a request from the Commissioner. Any provision of law providing for confidentiality of records does not apply to a request of the Commissioner pursuant to this Code section; provided, however, that the Commissioner shall preserve the confidentiality of any such records received;

To investigate each individual claim, utilizing, to the extent necessary, electronic warehouse receipt records, financial and banking records, market price records, and other records and documentation necessary to verify the claim;

To reinvestigate or reopen denied claims for awards filed with the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter as the Commissioner deems necessary;

To apply for funds from, and to submit all necessary forms and reports to, any federal agency participating in a cooperative program to compensate cotton producers who are eligible for indemnity payments pursuant to this chapter and to receive and administer federal funds for the purposes of this chapter;

To make indemnity payments to eligible cotton producers in the manner authorized by this chapter. Indemnity payments shall be made directly to eligible cotton producers;

To carry out programs designed to inform affected cotton producers of the purposes and requirements of this chapter and the indemnity program created pursuant to this chapter; and

To make a report to the secretary of agriculture, Congress, the Governor, and the General Assembly on or before October 1, 1999, and a report upon concluding the affairs of the Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund of 1999 describing the state’s efforts to use the indemnity fund to provide compensation to injured cotton producers.

The Commissioner and the department shall assist applicants with their claims for indemnity payments through educational programs and administrative assistance.

Neither rule making nor any proceeding or hearing under the program authorized by this chapter shall be subject in any way to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

2-19-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1.

2-19-4.
Claims by eligible cotton producers; filing; contents.

A claim may be filed by an eligible cotton producer, as defined in Code Section 2-19-2. In any case in which the person entitled to make a claim is mentally incompetent or is deceased, the claim may be filed on his or her behalf by his or her guardian, executor, or such other individual as is authorized to administer his or her estate.

A claim must be filed by the claimant not later than July 1, 1999; provided, however, that, upon good cause shown, the Commissioner may extend the time for filing for a period not exceeding two months after such date. Claims shall be filed in the office of the Commissioner in person or by mail. The department shall provide forms for use in filing claims.

The claim shall be verified and shall contain the following:

The name, address, and telephone number of the claimant;

A description of the amount, nature, and circumstances of the loss;

A statement of the extent to which the cotton producer has been or may reasonably be expected to be indemnified or reimbursed for these losses from any other source, including the proceeds of any distribution by a trustee in bankruptcy;

An authorization permitting the Commissioner to verify the contents of the application; and

Such other information as the Commissioner may require.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-19-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1 enacted Chapter 18 of Title 2, which was redesignated as Chapter 19 of Title 2. Therefore, the reference in subsection (a) to Code Section 2-18-2 was changed to Code Section 2-19-2 to reflect the renumbering.

2-19-5.
Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund of 1999 created.

There is created a fund to be known as the Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund of 1999. The Commissioner shall be the custodian of the fund, shall administer the fund, and may invest the resources of the fund in the same manner and fashion that an insurer authorized to issue contracts of life insurance is authorized to invest its resources.

The fund shall consist of $5 million of federal moneys received pursuant to section 1121 of the federal Omnibus Consolidated and Emergency Supplemental Appropriations Act for Fiscal Year 1999, Public Law 105-277; all moneys appropriated by the General Assembly as required by section 1121 of the federal Omnibus Consolidated and Emergency Supplemental Appropriations Act for Fiscal Year 1999, Public Law 105-277, for the purpose of compensating claimants under this chapter; any other moneys made available to the fund; and any interest or earnings on such moneys accruing to the fund.

All funds appropriated to or otherwise paid into the fund shall be presumptively concluded to have been committed to the purpose for which they have been appropriated or paid and shall not lapse.

The Commissioner is authorized, subject to the limitations contained in this chapter, to disburse the appropriate indemnity payments to the persons eligible for such payments under this chapter from the Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund of 1999.

Following the receipt of all claims, the investigation of each claim, as necessary, and the making of a determination that an award should or should not be paid for each claim filed, the Commissioner is authorized to draw warrants upon the Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund of 1999 to pay the indemnity amounts granted to eligible recipients from such fund. If the total amount of all claims approved for payment exceeds the total amount available in the fund for such payments, a pro rata payment shall be made to each approved claimant in the proportion that such claimant’s approved claim amount bears to the total of all approved claims.

If more than $5 million has been paid to cotton producers prior to January 1, 2000, any excess funds in the Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund of 1999 shall be expended as provided in Code Section 2-19-5.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-19-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1510, § 4; Ga. L. 2001, p. 956, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 956, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “if any part of this Act is declared unconstitutional, it would have enacted any remaining parts of the Act which preserve its essential intent.”

2-19-5.1.
“Cotton ginner” defined; payment of excess funds in indemnity fund; filing claims.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Contingent claim” means a claim filed because a trustee in bankruptcy had asserted, on or before March 1, 2001, a preference claim against the claimant to recover payments without which the claimant would have suffered a loss compensable under this chapter. “Contingent claim” also means a claim that would have been contingent, if it had been filed by a producer on or before May 1, 2000, or by a ginner on or before July 1, 2000.

“Cotton ginner” means any person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation which operated a cotton gin in this state on May 1, 2000, and which incurred a loss as described in this Code section on or before May 1, 2000.

If Congress so requires before January 1, 2002, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, after all valid and properly filed noncontingent claims of cotton producers filed on or before May 1, 2000, have been paid and after all valid and properly filed contingent claims of cotton producers filed on or before August 1, 2001, have been paid, any moneys remaining in the Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund of 1999, shall be paid to cotton ginners who:

Incurred a loss as the result of the business failure of any cotton buyer doing business in this state or the failure or refusal of any such cotton buyer to pay the contracted price which had been agreed upon by the ginner and the buyer for cotton grown in this state on or after January 1, 1997, and which had been purchased or contracted by the ginner from cotton producers in this state;

Paid cotton producers the amount which the cotton ginner had agreed to pay for such cotton received from such cotton producers in this state;

Notified the Commissioner on or before May 1, 2000, either orally or in writing, of a loss sustained by such cotton ginner as a result of the business failure of any cotton buyer doing business in this state or the failure or refusal of such cotton buyer to pay the contracted price which had been agreed upon by the ginner and the buyer for cotton grown in this state on or after January 1, 1997, and which had been purchased or contracted by the ginner from cotton producers in this state; and

Filed any noncontingent claim for indemnification from the Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund of 1999 with the Commissioner, in writing and accompanied by sufficient proof of such losses, on or before July 1, 2000, or filed any contingent claim on or before August 1, 2001.

Claims shall be filed by cotton ginners, shall contain the same information, and shall be verified in the same manner as provided in Code Section 2-19-4 for claims by cotton producers. The Commissioner shall have the same powers and duties to investigate, process, and pay claims of cotton ginners as provided in Code Section 2-19-3 for claims of cotton producers. Claims and the acceptance of payments on such claims shall be subject to Code Sections 2-19-6 and 2-19-7. Properly filed, verified, and proven claims by cotton ginners shall be paid by the Commissioner from the fund on or before December 31, 2001, or as soon as administratively practical thereafter. The payment of such claims shall not affect any payments which have previously been made to cotton producers from the fund. If insufficient moneys remain in the fund to pay the total amount of all claims filed by cotton ginners, claims shall be paid on a proportional basis, based on the ratio of each cotton ginner’s properly filed and proven claim to the total of all cotton ginners’ claims properly filed and proven. Any moneys remaining in the Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund of 1999 on January 1, 2002, after the payment of claims shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury.

Also notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, including subsection (c) of this Code section, any moneys remaining in the Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund of 1999 after all valid and properly filed noncontingent claims of cotton producers have been paid, shall also be paid to eligible cotton producers who filed contingent but otherwise valid claims on or before August 1, 2001.

For a contingent claim to be paid, the claimant must tender proof acceptable to the Commissioner no later than November 30, 2001, that the contingency has occurred and the claimant has suffered the loss which would have been eligible but for the alleged preference payments. A contingent claim may be paid from the fund only to the extent of the actual recovery by the trustee. The Commissioner shall consider the reasonableness of any settlement or any apparent failure to litigate in good faith with the trustee. The Commissioner may cast upon contingent claimants the burden of proving the reasonableness of any settlement or apparent failure to litigate in good faith.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-19-5.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1510, § 5; Ga. L. 2001, p. 956, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 2/HB 95.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “such” was deleted following “such” in paragraph (b)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 956, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “if any part of this Act is declared unconstitutional, it would have enacted any remaining parts of the Act which preserve its essential intent.”

2-19-6.
Stipulations on acceptance of indemnity payments; recovery of payments by the Commissioner.

Acceptance of an indemnity payment made pursuant to this chapter shall subrogate the state, to the extent of such indemnity payment, to any right or right of action accruing to the claimant to recover payments on account of losses resulting from the loss of the cotton or proceeds from the sale of the cotton with respect to which the indemnity payment is made. Acceptance of an indemnity payment made pursuant to this chapter shall constitute an agreement on the part of the recipient to repay to the Commissioner for deposit into the general fund of the state treasury any and all amounts, except those amounts in excess of any indemnity payment, recovered by the claimant in any bankruptcy proceeding, other civil action, or in any other way arising from the loss of cotton or the loss of proceeds from the sale of cotton for which an indemnity payment has been made pursuant to this chapter. The requirements of this Code section shall be included in and made a condition of any claim filed pursuant to this chapter.

Alternatively, if Congress so requires,

Acceptance of an indemnity payment made pursuant to this chapter shall constitute an agreement on the part of the recipient to repay to the Commissioner for deposit into the Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund of 1999, any and all amounts, except those amounts in excess of any indemnity payment, recovered by the claimant in any bankruptcy proceeding, other civil action, or in any other way arising from the loss of cotton or the loss of proceeds from the sale of cotton for which an indemnity payment has been made pursuant to this chapter. The requirements of this Code section shall be deemed a condition of any claim filed pursuant to this chapter.

The proceeds of any bond collected by the commissioner for the benefit of claimants, who have been paid by the Indemnity Fund, to that extent will be paid into the fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-19-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 956, § 4.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 956, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “if any part of this Act is declared unconstitutional, it would have enacted any remaining parts of the Act which preserve its essential intent.”

2-19-7.
Violations of chapter.

Any person who asserts a false claim under the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a violation of Code Section 16-10-20 and, upon conviction, shall be punished as provided in such Code section. Upon conviction thereof, such person shall further forfeit any benefit received pursuant to this chapter and shall reimburse and repay the state for payments received or paid on his or her behalf pursuant to any of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-19-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1.

2-19-8.
Appropriation of funds by the General Assembly.

No indemnity payments shall be paid pursuant to this chapter unless the General Assembly appropriates not less than $5 million of state funds to the Georgia Cotton Producers Indemnity Fund of 1999, and such appropriated state funds become available to the fund on or before July 1, 1999, for the purpose of making indemnity payments. This chapter shall be repealed on July 1, 1999, if the General Assembly has not appropriated $5 million or more of state funds on or before such date to match the $5 million in federal funds made available for the purpose of making indemnity payments pursuant to the federal act. If this chapter is repealed pursuant to the provisions of this Code section, all moneys received from the United States pursuant to the federal act shall be repaid to the secretary of agriculture as provided in the federal act. If this chapter is repealed as provided in this Code section, the Commissioner and the department shall be authorized to assist the secretary of agriculture in determining eligibility of Georgia cotton producers for indemnity payments by the secretary.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-19-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1 was funded in 1999.